Utah statutes.
11-42-416.   Validation of prior assessment proceedings.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), all proceedings taken before April 30, 2007
related to the levy of assessments are validated, ratified, and confirmed, and
the assessments are declared to be legal and valid assessments.
(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the validity of an
assessment whose legality is being contested on April 30, 2007.
(3) (a)  This chapter applies to all assessments levied after April 30, 2007,
even though proceedings were taken before that date under provisions of the
law then in effect but repealed or modified on or after that date.
(b)  Proceedings taken as described in Subsection (3)(a) under the law in
effect before April 30, 2007 are validated, ratified, and confirmed, except to
the extent that those proceedings are the subject of an action pending on
April 30, 2007 challenging the proceedings.
